Hawaii, session 2026, HB256.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the State is committed to maintaining the stringent environmental standards that govern the operations of waste-to-energy facilities and preventing any backsliding on existing emission limits that may be proposed by the United States Environmental Protection Agency. Therefore, to protect against any weakening of applicable emission limits by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the purpose of this Act is to require an owner or operator of a waste-to-energy facility to comply with certain United States Environmental Protection Agency regulations as they existed on December 31, 2024, unless the emission limits are made more stringent by federal regulations or by the state air pollution control permit issued to that owner or operator by the department of health. SECTION 2.  An owner or operator of a waste-to-energy facility shall comply with the emission limitations of the following subparts of title 40 Code of Federal Regulations part 60 entitled "Standards of Performance for New Stationary Sources", as those subparts existed on December 31, 2024, which shall hereby be incorporated by reference, unless the emission limitations are made more stringent by federal regulations or by the state air pollution control permit issued to that owner or operator by the department of health: (1)  Subpart A, "General Provisions"; (2)  Subpart Cb, "Emissions Guidelines and Compliance Times for Large Municipal Waste Combustors That are Constructed on or Before September 20, 1994"; (3)  Subpart Ea, "Standards of Performance for Municipal Waste Combustors for Which Construction Is Commenced After December 20, 1989 and On or Before September 20, 1994"; (4)  Subpart Eb, "Standards of Performance for Large Municipal Waste Combustors for Which Construction is Commenced After September 20, 1994 or for Which Modification or Reconstruction is Commenced After June 19, 1996"; and (5)  Subpart AAAA, "Standards of Performance for Small Municipal Waste Combustion Units for Which Construction is Commenced After August 30, 1999 or for Which Modification or Reconstruction is Commenced After June 6, 2001". SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on December 31, 2050, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2027.